Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5349YC (2) 91 nls/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 514F.6, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 514F.6 Credentialing. 3 1. Retrospective payment. The commissioner shall adopt 4 rules to provide for the retrospective payment of clean 5 claims for covered services provided by a physician, advanced 6 registered nurse practitioner, or physician assistant health 7 care professional during the credentialing period, once the 8 physician, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or physician 9 assistant health care professional is credentialed. 10 2. Credentialing process. 11 a. A health insurer shall respond to a physician, advanced 12 registered nurse practitioner, or physician assistantâs health 13 care professionalâs request for credentialing within fifty-six 14 calendar days from the date of the request. 15 b. If a physicianâs, advanced registered nurse 16 practitionerâs, or physician assistantâs health care 17 professionalâs request for credentialing is denied by the 18 health insurer, the health insurer shall provide a reason for 19 the denial, in writing, to the physician, advanced registered 20 nurse practitioner, or physician assistant health care 21 professional . 22 3. Definitions. For purposes of this section : 23 a. âAdvanced registered nurse practitionerâ means a person 24 currently licensed as a registered nurse under chapter 152 or 25 152E who is licensed by the board of nursing as an advanced 26 registered nurse practitioner. 27 b. a. âClean claimâ means the same as defined in section 28 507B.4A, subsection 2 , paragraph âbâ . 29 c. b. âCredentialingâ means a process through which 30 a health insurer makes a determination based on criteria 31 established by the health insurer concerning whether a 32 physician, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or physician 33 assistant health care professional is eligible to provide 34 health care services to an insured and to receive reimbursement 35 -1- LSB 5349YC (2) 91 nls/ko 1/ 2 H.F. _____ for the health care services provided under an agreement 1 entered into between the physician, advanced registered nurse 2 practitioner, or physician assistant health care professional 3 and the health insurer. 4 d. c. âCredentialing periodâ means the time period between 5 the health insurerâs receipt of a physicianâs, advanced 6 registered nurse practitionerâs, or physician assistantâs 7 health care professionalâs application for credentialing and 8 approval of that application by the health insurer. 9 d. âHealth care professionalâ means the same as defined in 10 section 514J.102. 11 e. âPhysicianâ means a licensed doctor of medicine and 12 surgery or a licensed doctor of osteopathic medicine and 13 surgery. 14 f. âPhysician assistantâ means the same as defined in 15 section 148C.1 . 16